Georgia, session 2025_26, HB719.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
An Act to provide for the compensation of the chairperson and members of the board of
education of Worth County, approved March 12, 1986 (Ga. L. 1986, p. 3710), is amended
by revising Section 1 as follows:
"SECTION 1.
The chairperson of the board of education of Worth County shall receive a per diem
of $300.00 and each member of the board shall receive a per diem of $200.00 for each day
of attendance at meetings of the board or of meeting and traveling inside or outside the
state as a member of a committee of the board on official business first authorized by a
majority of the board, plus reimbursement for actual expenses necessarily incurred in
H. B. 719
- 1 -

LC 47 3319/AP
connection therewith. The accounts for such service and expenses shall be submitted for
approval to the county school superintendent."
SECTION 2.
This Act shall become effective on the first day of the month following the month in which
it is approved by the Governor or in which it becomes law without such approval.
SECTION 3.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 719
- 2 -